Hawaii statutes.
[§436B-4] Rules. The licensing
authority may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate this chapter and
its licensing laws, and to carry out its purpose of protecting the health,
safety, and welfare of consumers of services provided by a profession or
vocation regulated by the licensing authority. The enumeration of specific
matters which may properly be made the subject of rules shall not be construed
to limit the licensing authority's broad general power to make all rules
necessary to fully effectuate the purpose of this chapter. [L 1991, c 111, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next